apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i__vbtr_ntr">
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ita</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itaj</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itan</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ataj</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atan</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ontaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ante</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l>                <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igi</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igas</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igis</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igos</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igus</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igita</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitaj</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitan</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igata</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igataj</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatan</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igonta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igontaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igante</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginte</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igu</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="antaŭkonsenti">                  <i>antaŭkonsent</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="antaŭludi">                      <i>antaŭlud</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="antaŭparoli">                    <i>antaŭparol</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="argumenti">                      <i>argument</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="babilaĉi">                       <i>babilaĉ</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="babili">                         <i>babil</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="balbuti">                        <i>balbut</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="batadi">                         <i>batad</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="bategi">                         <i>bateg</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="bati">                           <i>bat</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="beki">                           <i>bek</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="blovi">                          <i>blov</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="danci">                          <i>danc</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="disponi">                        <i>dispon</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ekkanti">                        <i>ekkant</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ekkrii">                         <i>ekkri</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ekloĝi">                         <i>ekloĝ</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="elaĉeti">                        <i>elaĉet</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="folii">                          <i>foli</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="fumi">                           <i>fum</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kanteti">                        <i>kantet</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kanti">                          <i>kant</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="konsenti">                       <i>konsent</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="korni">                          <i>korn</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kosti">                          <i>kost</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kraĉeti">                        <i>kraĉet</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kraĉi">                          <i>kraĉ</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kredi">                          <i>kred</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kriegi">                         <i>krieg</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="krii">                           <i>kri</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="loĝi">                           <i>loĝ</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ludi">                           <i>lud</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="lumi">                           <i>lum</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malcedi">                        <i>malced</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malkonsenti">                    <i>malkonsent</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malservi">                       <i>malserv</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malvenki">                       <i>malvenk</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malzorgi">                       <i>malzorg</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="nei">                            <i>ne</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="pepi">                           <i>pep</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="postrigardi">                    <i>postrigard</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="prediki">                        <i>predik</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="resoni">                         <i>reson</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ŝipi">                           <i>ŝip</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="sonori">                         <i>sonor</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="sulki">                          <i>sulk</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="transpasi">                      <i>transpas</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
    <e lm="zorgi">                          <i>zorg</i><par n="i__vbtr_ntr"/></e>
